Wisconsin, session 2025, SB920.
do enact as follows:SB920,11Section 1. 118.15 (3) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 217, is amended to read:SB920,2,143118.15 (3) (a) Any child who is excused by the school board because the child 4is temporarily not in proper physical or mental condition to attend a school program 5but who can be expected to return to a school program upon termination or 6abatement of the illness or condition. The school attendance officer may request 7the parent or guardian of the child to obtain a written statement from a licensed 8physician, naturopathic doctor, dentist, chiropractor, optometrist, psychologist, 9physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse, or registered nurse 10described under s. 255.06 (1) (f) 1. or Christian Science practitioner living and 11residing in this state, who is listed in the Christian Science Journal, as sufficient 12proof of the physical or mental condition of the child. An excuse under this 13paragraph shall be in writing and shall state the time period for which it is valid, 14not to exceed 30 days.SB920,215Section 2. Effective date.SB920,2,1616(1) This act takes effect on September 1, 2026.SB920,2,1717